Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-311
Chairman; officers, experts, employees; employ; compensation.

The chairman may, with the approval of the council, employ such officers, experts, and other employees as may be needed and shall fix their compensation within the amounts made available for such purposes.

Laws 1973, LB 121, § 3.